Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 13
SCIENTIFIC AND CULTURAL FACILITIES DISTRICT

Editor's note:

For a discussion of the difference between service authorities authorized by § 17 of article XIV of the Colorado constitution and statutorily created special districts, see Anema v. Transit Const. Authority, 788 P.2d 1261 (Colo. 1990).

Cross references:

For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution.

Section

32-13-101. Short title.

This article shall be known as the "Scientific and Cultural Facilities District Act".

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1254, § 1, effective July 1.

32-13-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the scientific and cultural facilities located in the state of Colorado are a rich source of knowledge and inspiration to all of the residents of the state, that the preservation and development of such facilities are vital to the cultural and intellectual life of the state, that scientific and cultural facilities are an important factor to the economic well-being of the state, that economic development and tourism are needed to maintain and to promote such facilities, and that creation of scientific and cultural facilities districts will promote the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of the state.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1254, § 1, effective July 1.

32-13-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Annual operating expenses" means expenditures for all purposes except capital construction, endowment, and payment of debt principal or interest.

(1.5) "Annual operating income" means operating income from all mission-based sources, except capital construction fund income, designated funds raised for the purchase of specified capital needs, unrelated business income, funds raised for the purpose of debt reduction, income for endowment corpus, any distribution of moneys by the board, and any restriction established through board policy.

"Board" means the board of directors of a scientific and cultural facilities district created pursuant to this article.

"County cultural council" means a council comprised of members appointed by the county commissioners of the county, the city council of the city and county of Denver, or the city council of the city and county of Broomfield who reside within the boundaries of the district and proportionately represent the population of the incorporated and unincorporated portions of the county.

"Cultural facility" means a nonprofit institutional organization under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, or any agency of local government with the primary purpose of enlightening and entertaining the public through the production, presentation, exhibition, advancement, or preservation of visual arts, performing arts, or cultural history, as such terms are defined by the board. "Cultural facility" does not include any agency of the state, any educational institution, any radio or television broadcasting network or station, any cable communications system, or any newspaper or magazine.

"District" means a scientific and cultural facilities district created pursuant to this article.

"Paid attendance" means the total paid attendance at all mission-based programs as verified by annual audit reports.

(6.5) "Reasonable costs related to a coordinated election" means the amount that the district owes a county or a city and county under the terms of an agreement entered into pursuant to the provisions of section 1-7-116, C.R.S., for the district's share of the costs of a coordinated election; except that such amount shall not exceed the total county or city and county election costs multiplied by one-half of the sum of the weighted population average and the weighted ballot average. Weighted population average equals the active registered voters who reside in both the district and the county or city and county divided by the sum of all active registered voters for each political subdivision, as such term is defined in section 1-7-116 (1), C.R.S., for which the county or city and county conducts the coordinated election. Weighted ballot average equals the number of district referred measures, as such term is defined in section 1-1-104 (34.5), C.R.S., on the ballot in question divided by the total number of referred measures, initiatives, and candidate elections in the coordinated election.

With respect to the Denver metropolitan scientific and cultural facilities district, "scientific facility" means a nonprofit institutional organization under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, or an agency of local government with the primary purpose of enlightening and entertaining the public through the production, presentation, exhibition, advancement, or preservation of natural history or natural sciences including earth, life, or physical sciences, as such terms are defined by the board. "Scientific facility" does not include any agency of the state, any educational institution, any radio or television broadcasting network or station, any cable communications system, any newspaper or magazine, or any organization that is engaged solely in the acquisition or physical restoration of historic buildings, structures, or sites.

With respect to scientific and cultural facilities districts other than the Denver metropolitan scientific and cultural facilities district, "scientific facility" means a nonprofit institutional organization under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, or an agency of local government with the primary purpose of enlightening and entertaining the public through the production, presentation, exhibition, advancement, or preservation of natural history or natural sciences including earth, life, or physical sciences, as such terms are defined by the board. "Scientific facility" does not include any agency of the state, any educational institution, any radio or television broadcasting network or station, any cable communications system, or any newspaper or magazine.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 480, § 1, effective March 31, 1994.)

For purposes of this subsection (7), "cultural history" means the history that concentrates upon the social, intellectual, and artistic aspects or forces in the life of a people, region, state, or nation, for which an understanding and appreciation may be gained through buildings, structures, sites, architecture, objects, and activities significant in said history.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1254, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(7) amended, p. 990, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 94:

(7)(a) and (7)(b)(II) amended and (7)(c) added, p. 480, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 267, § 9, effective November 15.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended and (1.5) added, p. 284, § 1, effective July 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(6.5) added, p. 1779, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2016:

(1.5), (4), (6), (7)(a), and (7)(b)(I) amended, ch. 135, p. 389, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

32-13-104. Creation of district - area of district.

There is hereby created a district to be known and designated as the "Denver Metropolitan Scientific and Cultural Facilities District". The area comprising the district shall consist of all of the area within the boundaries of the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, and Jefferson, all of the area within the boundaries of the city and county of Broomfield and the city and county of Denver, and all of the area within the county of Douglas; except that the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock and the area within the boundaries of the town of Larkspur in the county of Douglas shall not be included in the district.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1255, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1339, § 4, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(1)(b) amended, p. 308, § 4, effective April 15.

L. 99:

(1)(b) amended, p. 420, § 4, effective April 30.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 285, § 2, effective July 1, 2006.

32-13-104.3. Additional district area - petition - required filings.

For any area that is contiguous to any boundary of the district, the area may be included in the district if the following requirements are satisfied:

A petition signed by one hundred percent of the owners of the land comprising the area proposed to be included, including the owners of any land constituting a planned unit development or subdivision, is presented to the board. The petition shall contain a legal description of the land comprising the area proposed to be included, state that assent to the inclusion is given by the fee owner thereof, and be acknowledged by the fee owner in the same manner as required for the conveyance of land.

The board resolves to accept the area specified in the petition into the district.

Prior to including any additional area in the district pursuant to this section, the district shall file a notice and map containing a legal description of the area with the county clerk and recorder of any county in which the area is located, the division of local government in the department of local affairs, and the department of revenue. Upon receiving a notice and map pursuant to this subsection (2), the department of revenue shall communicate with any taxing jurisdictions affected by the inclusion of the additional area in the district in order to facilitate the administration and collection of taxes within the additional area and to identify all retailers affected by the inclusion of the additional area. The department of revenue shall make copies of any such notices and maps available to all taxing jurisdictions in the state, including special districts that impose a sales tax.

A map of the land comprising the area proposed to be included in the district shall be available for review by the landowners of such area when the landowners sign a petition to be included in the district pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 924, § 1, effective August 4.

32-13-104.5. Additional district area - Douglas county.

In addition to the areas described in section 32-13-104, all or any portion of the area within the boundaries of Douglas county that is not included in the Denver metropolitan scientific and cultural facilities district but is contiguous with the district may be included in the district if the following requirements are met:

A proposal to include the area proposed to be included in the district is initiated by any of the following methods:

A petition requesting an election for the purpose of including the area proposed to be included in the district is signed by at least five percent of the eligible electors of the unincorporated portion of such area and of each portion of such area that is within a municipality; or

The governing bodies of all municipalities that include portions of the area proposed to be included in the district and the board of county commissioners of Douglas county adopt resolutions requesting an election for the purpose of including the area in the district. The board of county commissioners of Douglas county shall adopt such a resolution only after all municipalities that include portions of the areas proposed to be included have adopted such resolutions.

An election is held and conducted in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., and the following requirements:

The election is held at a general or odd-year election not later than 2025, as determined by intergovernmental agreement of the governing bodies of all municipalities that include portions of the area proposed to be included in the district and the board of county commissioners of Douglas county;

The ballot provides for the eligible electors in the area proposed to be included in the district to vote for or against the inclusion of the proposed area in the district;

The ballot is in a single form determined by intergovernmental agreement of the governing bodies of all municipalities that include portions of the area proposed to be included in the district and the board of county commissioners of Douglas county;

The ballot contains a description of the area proposed to be included within the district;

The ballot contains the current rates of sales tax levied by the district; and

The ballot contains the following question: "Shall the area described in the ballot be included in the Denver metropolitan cultural and scientific facilities district?"

The governing bodies of all municipalities that include portions of the area proposed to be included in the district and the board of county commissioners of Douglas county shall, pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement, adopt resolutions calling the election authorized by this section. The resolutions shall state:

The object and purpose of the election;

A description of the area proposed to be included in the district;

The date of the election; and

The name of the designated election official responsible for conducting the election pursuant to articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 357, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 99:

(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 452, § 9, effective August 4.

L. 2004:

IP(1), IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(I), and (1)(b)(I) amended, p. 285, § 3, effective July 1, 2006.

L. 2016:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 16-016), ch. 135, p. 390, § 2, effective April 29.

32-13-104.7. Annexation of enclaves.

When any unincorporated territory has been entirely contained within the boundaries of the Denver metropolitan scientific and cultural facilities district, the board may, by resolution, annex the territory to the district. The board shall give notice of a proposed annexation resolution by publishing a copy of the resolution once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the territory proposed to be annexed. The board shall also send a copy of the proposed annexation resolution by registered mail to the board of county commissioners and county attorney of the county containing the territory to be annexed, to any special district or school district having territory within the territory to be annexed, and to the executive director of the department of revenue. The first publication of the notice and the mailing of the proposed annexation resolution shall occur at least thirty days prior to the final adoption of the resolution, and the board shall allow interested persons to testify for or against the resolution at a public hearing held prior to the final adoption of the resolution.

No territory may be annexed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if any part of the district boundary or area surrounding the territory consists of public rights-of-way, including streets and alleys, that are not immediately adjacent to the district on the side of the right-of-way opposite to the territory.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 822, § 2, effective August 8.

32-13-105. Authorizing elections - repeal.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed. (See Editor's note at the end of this section.)

The provisions of article 40 of title 1, C.R.S., regarding the following subject matter shall apply to petitions that may be submitted pursuant to this section: Form requirements and approval; circulation of petitions; elector information and signatures on petitions; affidavits and requirements of circulators of petitions; and verification of signatures, including but not limited to cure of an insufficiency of signatures and protests regarding sufficiency statements and procedures for hearings or further appeals regarding such protests. The provisions of article 40 of title 1, C.R.S., regarding review and comment, the setting of a ballot title, including but not limited to the duties of the title board, rehearings, and appeals, and the number of signatures required shall not apply to petitions that may be submitted pursuant to this section.

Any petition shall be filed with the secretary of state at least three months before the general election or the election held on the first Tuesday of November in an odd-numbered year, whichever is applicable, at which it may be voted upon. Notice of any question to be submitted to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district after verification of the signatures on any petition filed with the secretary of state and at which election such question shall be submitted shall be filed by the board in the office of the secretary of state prior to fifty-five days before such election.

Notice of any question to be submitted to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of the district pursuant to this section and at which election such question shall be submitted shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state prior to fifty-five days before such election.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable if the authority of the district to levy and collect any sales and use taxes approved by the registered electors or to continue to levy and collect any sales and use taxes approved by the registered electors has expired pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Repealed.

For purposes of complying with the provisions of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution and upon proper submittal of a valid initiative petition to or upon the adoption of a resolution by the board, the district may submit to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district, at a general election or an election held on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, the question of whether the district shall be authorized to continue the levy and collection of the aggregate one-tenth of one percent sales and use tax as specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section, as it existed on April 29, 2016, for a period not to exceed twelve years from the date upon which the authority of the district to levy and collect the sales and use taxes is scheduled to expire, as follows:

A uniform sales and use tax throughout said geographical area at a rate of sixty-four one-thousandths of one percent for total annual revenues collected by the district up to and including thirty-eight million dollars and at a rate of fifty-seven one-thousandths of one percent after total annual revenues collected by the district exceed thirty-eight million dollars, upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales and use tax is levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.; except that such sales and use tax shall not be levied on the sale or use of aviation fuel, to be distributed to the Denver museum of nature and science, the Denver zoological gardens, the Denver art museum, the Denver botanical gardens, and the Denver center for the performing arts pursuant to the provisions of section 32-13-107 (3)(a);

A uniform sales and use tax throughout said geographical area at a rate of twenty-two one-thousandths of one percent for total annual revenues collected by the district up to and including thirty-eight million dollars and at a rate of twenty-six one-thousandths of one percent after total annual revenues collected by the district exceed thirty-eight million dollars, upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales and use tax is levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.; except that such sales and use tax shall not be levied on the sale or use of aviation fuel, to be distributed to scientific and cultural facilities pursuant to the provisions of section 32-13-107 (3)(b); and

A uniform sales and use tax throughout said geographical area at a rate of fourteen one-thousandths of one percent for total annual revenues collected by the district up to and including thirty-eight million dollars and at a rate of seventeen one-thousandths of one percent after total annual revenues collected by the district exceed thirty-eight million dollars, upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales and use tax is levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.; except that such sales and use tax shall not be levied on the sale or use of aviation fuel, to be distributed to scientific and cultural facilities pursuant to the provisions of section 32-13-107 (3)(c).

A resolution or the summary for a petition pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (10) shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following statements:

That the district would continue to levy and collect the aggregate one-tenth of one percent sales and use tax as specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section for a period not to exceed twelve years from the date upon which the authority of the district to levy and collect the sales and use taxes is scheduled to expire; and

The month, day, and year on which the authority of the district to levy and collect the sales and use taxes shall expire.

The district may submit the question set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (10) to the registered electors of the district:

After being presented with a petition requesting the submittal of the question that is signed by registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district in an amount equal to at least five percent of the total number of votes cast within the geographical boundaries of the district for all candidates for the office of secretary of state at the previous general election and after verification of the signatures on the petition by the secretary in accordance with subsection (7) of this section; or

After the adoption of a resolution by the board.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (d), at the election, the question appearing on the ballot shall be as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (d), the ballot title shall be a statement of the language included in the question set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d); except that the words "SHALL THERE BE" shall not be included in the statement, and the statement shall end with a period instead of a question mark.

The ballot question specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) and the ballot title specified in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (d) may be modified by the proponents of an initiative petition or the board, as applicable, only to the extent necessary to conform to the requirements of any final decision of a district or appellate court regarding the legal requirements for ballot questions and titles.

If at any election a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the question vote affirmatively on the question authorizing the district to continue the levy and collection of the sales and use taxes specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section, as modified pursuant to subparagraphs (I), (II), and (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (10), until June 30, 2030, then such sales and use taxes shall continue to be levied, collected, and distributed as provided for in this article until said date.

Repealed.

All of the electors within the area of the boundaries of the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, and Jefferson, all of the electors within the boundaries of the city and county of Broomfield and the city and county of Denver, and all of the electors within Douglas county excluding the electors within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock or the town of Larkspur, are eligible electors for the purpose of the election to be held pursuant to this subsection (10).

For purposes of complying with the provisions of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution and upon proper submittal of a valid initiative petition to or upon the adoption of a resolution by the board, the district may submit to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district, at a general election or an election held on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, the question of whether the district shall be authorized to continue the levy and collection of the aggregate one-tenth of one percent sales and use tax as specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (10) of this section for a period not to exceed twelve years from the date upon which the authority of the district to levy and collect the sales and use taxes is scheduled to expire.

A resolution or the summary for a petition pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (11) shall include, but not be limited to, the following statements:

That the district would continue to levy and collect the aggregate one-tenth of one percent sales and use tax as specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (10) of this section for a period not to exceed twelve years from the date upon which the authority of the district to levy and collect the sales and use taxes is scheduled to expire; and

The month, day, and year on which the authority of the district to levy and collect the sales and use taxes expires.

The district may submit the question set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (11) to the registered electors of the district:

After being presented with a petition requesting the submittal of the question that is signed by registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district in an amount equal to at least five percent of the total number of votes cast within the geographical boundaries of the district for all candidates for the office of secretary of state at the previous general election and after verification of the signatures on the petition by the secretary in accordance with subsection (7) of this section; or

After the adoption of a resolution by the board.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (d), at the election, the question appearing on the ballot shall be as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (d), the ballot title is a statement of the language included in the question set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d); except that the words "SHALL THERE BE" are not included in the statement, and the statement ends with a period instead of a question mark.

The ballot question specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) and the ballot title specified in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (d) may be modified by the proponents of an initiative petition or the board, as applicable, only to the extent necessary to conform to the requirements of any final decision of a district or appellate court regarding the legal requirements for ballot questions and titles.

If at any election a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the question vote affirmatively on the question authorizing the district to continue the levy and collection of the sales and use taxes specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (10) of this section until the date specified in the question, then such sales and use taxes shall continue to be levied, collected, and distributed as provided for in this article until said date.

The provisions of this subsection (11) are applicable only if prior voter approval is obtained to levy and collect the sales and use taxes specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (10) of this section.

"SHALL THERE BE AN EXTENSION UNTIL JUNE 30, 2030, OF THE AGGREGATE 0.1 PERCENT SALES AND USE TAXES CURRENTLY LEVIED AND COLLECTED BY THE DENVER METROPOLITAN SCIENTIFIC AND CULTURAL FACILITIES DISTRICT THAT ARE SCHEDULED TO EXPIRE ON JUNE 30, 2018, FOR ASSISTING SCIENTIFIC AND CULTURAL FACILITIES WITHIN THE DISTRICT, WHILE AUTHORIZING THE DISTRICT TO CONTINUE TO COLLECT, RETAIN, AND SPEND ALL REVENUE GENERATED BY SUCH TAX IN EXCESS OF THE LIMITATION PROVIDED IN ARTICLE X OF SECTION 20 OF THE COLORADO CONSTITUTION AND WHILE MODIFYING THE RATES OF THE THREE INDIVIDUAL SALES AND USE TAXES COLLECTED BY THE DISTRICT AS FOLLOWS: FOR TOTAL ANNUAL REVENUES COLLECTED BY THE DISTRICT UP TO THIRTY-EIGHT MILLION DOLLARS, DECREASING THE .0655 PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX TO .064 PERCENT; INCREASING THE .021 PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX TO .022 PERCENT; AND INCREASING THE .0135 PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX TO .014 PERCENT; AND, FOR TOTAL ANNUAL REVENUES COLLECTED BY THE DISTRICT THAT EXCEED THIRTY-EIGHT MILLION DOLLARS, DECREASING THE .064 PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX TO .057 PERCENT; INCREASING THE .022 PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX TO .026 PERCENT; AND INCREASING THE .014 PERCENT SALES AND USE TAX TO .017 PERCENT?"

"SHALL THERE BE AN EXTENSION UNTIL (MONTH, DAY, AND YEAR) OF THE AGGREGATE 0.1 PERCENT SALES AND USE TAXES CURRENTLY LEVIED AND COLLECTED BY THE DENVER METROPOLITAN SCIENTIFIC AND CULTURAL FACILITIES DISTRICT THAT ARE SCHEDULED TO EXPIRE ON (MONTH, DAY, AND YEAR) FOR ASSISTING SCIENTIFIC AND CULTURAL FACILITIES WITHIN THE DISTRICT, WHILE AUTHORIZING THE DISTRICT TO CONTINUE TO COLLECT, RETAIN, AND SPEND ALL REVENUE GENERATED BY SUCH TAX IN EXCESS OF THE LIMITATION PROVIDED IN ARTICLE X OF SECTION 20 OF THE COLORADO CONSTITUTION?"

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1255, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) and (3) amended and (4) to (8) added, pp. 471, 464, §§ 2, 1, effective March 31.

L. 95:

(9) added, p. 859, § 111, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) and (4)(a) amended, p. 1040, § 7, effective July 1; (5)(a), (5)(b)(I), (5)(d)(I), (5)(d)(IV), (5)(e), (7)(a), and (7)(c) amended and (5)(f) and (10) added, pp. 286, 288, §§ 4, 5, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(1)(a), (4)(a)(I), (5)(a)(I), and (5)(a)(II) amended, p. 777, § 66, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(5)(a)(III) amended, p. 1506, § 52, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(5)(a) amended, (HB 09-1342), ch. 354, p. 1848, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) to (4), (9), and (10)(e) repealed, (5)(d)(IV), (7)(a), (7)(c), (8), (10)(a), (10)(d)(I), and (10)(d)(IV) amended, and (5)(g), (10)(f), and (11) added, (SB 16-016), ch. 135, pp. 401, 391, §§ 7, 3, effective April 29.

32-13-106. Board of directors - powers and duties.

The district created in section 32-13-104 shall be governed by a board of directors, to be appointed as follows:

One director each shall be appointed by the boards of county commissioners of each county in the district, one director shall be appointed by the city council of the city and county of Denver, one director shall be appointed by the city council of the city and county of Broomfield; and

If an odd number of directors is appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), four directors shall be appointed by the governor, and if an even number of directors is appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), three directors shall be appointed by the governor; except that the total number of directors appointed pursuant to this subsection (1) shall not exceed eleven. In the event that a new county or city and county elects a director pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) that would cause the number of directors to exceed eleven, the longest-serving director appointed by the governor shall become an ex officio director of the board and shall no longer have the authority to vote in any board action pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The directors appointed by the governor shall be individuals who represent different segments of society, including, but not limited to, business, education, government, accounting, and foundation management.

A director appointed pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be appointed to serve for a term of three years, but no director shall serve more than two succeeding terms. Any such director may be removed at any time during his or her term by the appointing authority. The board shall be appointed prior to the submission to the registered electors of the district of the question specified in section 32-13-105.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

To fix the time and place at which its regular meetings shall be held. Meetings shall be held within the district and shall be open to the public.

To adopt and amend rules of procedure;

To select a chairman;

To hire such staff as may be necessary to assist the board in its duties;

To enter into contracts including but not limited to contracts for the provision of cultural services for the district;

To sue and be sued;

To decide at which election the question specified in section 32-13-105 shall be submitted to the registered electors;

To submit any question specified in section 32-13-105 to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district at the appropriate election upon the proper submittal of a valid initiative petition to or upon the adoption of a resolution by the district;

To administer and use moneys collected pursuant to section 32-13-107, in accordance with the guidelines specified in section 32-13-107 (3);

To develop reporting and review requirements governing receipt and expenditures of tax district funds;

Repealed.

To determine the eligibility of organizations that apply to the district for the moneys that the board distributes pursuant to section 32-13-107 (3)(b) and (3)(c). In determining such eligibility, the board may take into consideration the applicant's financial and organizational capacity to expend tax dollars to serve the public and achieve the mission of the organization.

To publish and update annual governance and transparency notice requirements by posting board member names, district contact information, and meeting information on the district's website.

All business of the board shall be conducted at regular meetings which shall be open to the public, and board action shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the total membership of the board. Members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for their necessary expenses while serving as members of the board.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 1256, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2)(g.5) added, p. 476, § 5, effective March 31.

L. 95:

(2)(j) added, p. 860, § 112, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 267, § 10, effective November 15.

L. 2004:

(1) amended and (2)(k) added, pp. 290, 291, §§ 6, 7, effective July 1, 2006.

L. 2016:

(2)(g.5) amended, (2)(j) repealed, and (2)(l) added, (SB 16-016), ch. 135, p. 395, § 4, effective April 29.